Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201681-1113.01
State budgets; department and agency budget requests; budget forms and instructions; when distributed; additional forms.

The forms and procedures required pursuant to subdivisions (1) and (2) of section 81-1113 shall only be prepared and distributed after:

(1) The final draft of the proposed budget forms and budget instructions have been provided to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst and an opportunity provided for recommendations from that office;

(2) The budget administrator and Legislative Fiscal Analyst have met and discussed the recommended changes; and

(3) A revised final draft of all proposed forms and instructions has been provided to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst.

If the budget administrator is unable to accommodate any recommended changes, the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be allowed to submit additional forms for the collection of information. Such forms shall be included as an attachment to the forms required by the Department of Administrative Services. All such forms shall be completed and submitted as a part of the budget submission and amendment process described in subdivisions (1) and (2) of section 81-1113.

Laws 1978, LB 526, § 4;

Laws 2016, LB1092, § 5.